Arkansas, session 2025, HB1282.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 16-22-501(a), concerning the intended
benefit that is required as an element of the unauthorized practice of law,
is amended to read as follows:
(a) A person commits an offense if, with intent to obtain a direct any
economic benefit for himself or herself, the person:
(1) Contracts with any person to represent that person with
regard to personal causes of action for property damages or personal injury;
(2) Advises any person as to the person's rights and the
advisability of making claims for personal injuries or property damages;
(3) Advises any person as to whether or not to accept an offered
sum of money in settlement of claims for personal injuries or property
damages;
(4) Enters into any contract with another person to represent
that person in personal injury or property damage matters on a contingent fee
basis with an attempted assignment of a portion of the person's cause of
action;
(5) Enters into any contract, except a contract of insurance,
with a third person which purports to grant the exclusive right to select and
*CEB109*
01/28/2025 9:51:20 AM CEB109

HB1282
retain legal counsel to represent the individual in any legal proceeding; or
(6) Contacts any person by telephone or in person for the
purpose of soliciting business which is legal in nature, as set forth above.

































01/28/2025 9:51:20 AM CEB109